Maryland, session 2026, HB0337.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
4–148.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0337*

HOUSE BILL 337
(A) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2026, AND EACH JULY 1 THEREAFTER, EACH
COUNTY BOARD SHALL SUBMIT A STUDENT RESIDENCY AND SCHOOL ZONES REPORT
TO THE DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING AND THE INTERAGENCY COMMISSION ON
SCHOOL CONSTRUCTION.
(B) (1) THE STUDENT RESIDENCY AND SCHOOL ZONES REPORT SHALL
INCLUDE:
(I) THE SCHOOL ZONE BOUNDARIES AND ATTENDANCE AREA
MAP;
(II) THE LOCATIONS OF EACH STUDENT’S RESIDENCE; AND
(III) THE STATE–RATED CAPACITY, STUDENT POPULATION, AND
CAPACITY PERCENTAGE OF EACH SCHOOL IN THE COUNTY.
(2) THE REPORT MAY NOT INCLUDE PERSONAL IDENTIFYING
INFORMATION OF A STUDENT.
(C) THE INTERAGENCY COMMISSION ON SCHOOL CONSTRUCTION SHALL
ADOPT REGULATIONS ESTABLISHING FORMATTING AND SUBMISSION
REQUIREMENTS FOR THE STUDENT RESIDENCY AND SCHOOL ZONES REPORT.
Article – Land Use
7–106.
A COUNTY’S ADEQUATE PUBLIC FACILITIES ORDINANCE THAT RESTRICTS
HOUSING DEVELOPMENT ON THE BASIS OF SCHOOL CAPACITY:
(1) MAY NOT DELAY THE PROCESSING AND COMPLETION OF
SUBDIVISION OR SITE DEVELOPMENT PLANS; BUT
(2) MAY DELAY THE ISSUANCE OF FINAL PERMITS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.